Washington statutes.
RCW 35.39.100

City retirement system—Investment advisory committee—Employment of members.

No advisory committee member during the term of appointment may be employed by any investment brokerage or mortgage servicing firm doing business with the retirement board.

[ 1982 c 166 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1982 c 166: See note following RCW 35.39.060.